Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.210

Prosecutions.

Any prosecution brought under this chapter may be instituted in any county in which the defendant or any defendant resides, or in which the violation was committed, or in which the defendant or any defendant has his or her principal place of business.

The superior courts are hereby vested with jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the commission issued hereunder, and to prevent and restrain violations thereof.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6024; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.210. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 15; RRS s 2874-15.]